Utah statutes.
63A-12-101.   Division of Archives and Records Service created -- Duties.

(1)  There is created the Division of Archives and Records Service within the Department of Administrative Services.

(2)  The state archives shall:

(a)  administer the state's archives and records management programs, including storage of records, central microphotography programs, and quality control;

(b)  apply fair, efficient, and economical management methods to the collection, creation, use, maintenance, retention, preservation, disclosure, and disposal of records and documents;

(c)  establish standards, procedures, and techniques for the effective management and physical care of records;

(d)  conduct surveys of office operations and recommend improvements in current records management practices, including the use of space, equipment, automation, and supplies used in creating, maintaining, storing, and servicing records;

(e)  establish standards for the preparation of schedules providing for the retention of records of continuing value and for the prompt and orderly disposal of state records no longer possessing sufficient administrative, historical, legal, or fiscal value to warrant further retention;

(f)  establish, maintain, and operate centralized microphotography lab facilities and quality control for the state;

(g)  provide staff and support services to the records committee;

(h)  develop training programs to assist records officers and other interested officers and employees of governmental entities to administer this chapter and Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act;

(i)  provide access to public records deposited in the archives;

(j)  administer and maintain the Utah Public Notice Website established under Section 63F-1-701;

(k)  provide assistance to any governmental entity in administering this chapter and Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act;

(l)  prepare forms for use by all governmental entities for a person requesting access to a record; and

(m)  if the department operates the Division of Archives and Records Service as an internal service fund agency in accordance with Section 63A-1-109.5, submit to the Rate Committee established in Section 63A-1-114:

(i)  the proposed rate and fee schedule as required by Section 63A-1-114; and

(ii)  other information or analysis requested by the Rate Committee.

(3)  The state archives may:

(a)  establish a report and directives management program; and

(b)  establish a forms management program.

(4)  The executive director of the Department of Administrative Services may direct the state archives to administer other functions or services consistent with this chapter and Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

